perfect.regex
[%^ ? -> []];

[g e -> [] || .#. _ b e, .#. _ e m p, .#. _ e n t, .#. _ e r, .#. _ g e, .#. _ m i s s,  .#. _ v e r,  .#. _ z e r, .#. _ ?* i e r];

[e -> o || _ %^ 4];
[e i -> i || _ %^ 5];
[e i -> i e || _ %^ 6];
[i -> o || _ %^ 7];
[i -> u || _ %^ 8];
[i e -> o || _ %^ 9];
[e -> a || _ %^ m];
